Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 5 Beer and Wine — Manufacture, Sale, and Transportation Generally
3-5-1405. Licenses — Scope — Restrictions.

(a)

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division may issue a license for a licensee to operate a small brewery that:

(1)

Manufactures at its licensed facility no less than thirty-five percent (35%) of its beer, malt beverages, and hard cider to be sold in the state and no more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year;

(2)

Sells to wholesale or to the consumer at the small brewery premises for consumption, either on or off the premises, brand name products of the licensed facility;

(3)

Stores any beer, malt beverages, and hard cider legally purchased for resale on the premises and on the premises of the one (1) separate brewing facility of a small brewery authorized under subdivision (a)(9) of this section;

(4)

Serves on the premises:

(A)

Complimentary samples of beer produced by the small brewery; and

(B)(i)

Spirituous liquors for on-premises consumption in a taproom under the license of the small brewery.

(ii)

Subdivision (a)(4)(B)(i) of this section authorizing on-premises consumption is effective only in cities and counties, or portions of cities and counties, in which the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor is not prohibited as a result of a local option election held under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, and in which the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption has been approved by a majority vote at a referendum election as provided in this chapter;

(5)

Sells:

(A)

At retail, by the drink or by the package, beer produced on the premises of the small brewery if all sales occur in a wet territory; or

(B)(i)

At fairs and food and beer festivals with the permission and the consent of the management of the events.

(ii)

A sales and use tax permit also is required for sales under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section;

(6)(A)(i)

Sells and transports:

(a)

Beer produced on the premises of the small brewery to wholesale and small brewery license holders;

(b)

Beer, malt beverages, and hard cider produced on the premises of the small brewery to retail license holders and small brewery license holders if the total production of the permitted brewery does not exceed fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels per year from all facilities under common ownership with the small brewery.

(ii)

Each permitted brewery shall submit documentation of production each year to renew the permit with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(iii)

A small brewery may distribute no more than fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels per year.

(B)(i)

To sell and transport beer under subdivision (a)(6)(A) of this section, the small brewery license holder shall obtain a small brewery wholesale permit.

(ii)

The small brewery license holder shall pay a fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per year for the permit under subdivision (a)(6)(B)(i) of this section;

(7)

Sells for consumption on the premises of the small brewery:

(A)

Beer produced by the small brewery or another small brewery;

(B)

Wine; or

(C)

Hard cider;

(8)

Operates no more than two (2) small brewery tap rooms; and

(9)(A)

Maintains one (1) separate brewing facility for the production or storage of beer, malt liquor, or hard cider as needed to meet demand, except that each facility used by the small brewery licensee shall not in the aggregate produce more than forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels of beer, malt beverage, and hard cider per year.

(B)

Beer, malt beverage, and hard cider produced by a separate brewing facility of a small brewery licensee shall be:

(i)

Sold to a licensed wholesaler; or

(ii)

Transported:

(a)

From the separate brewing facility to a small brewery commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for retail sale for consumption on or off the licensed premises; and

(b)

To the separate brewing facility from a small brewery commonly owned by the owner of the separate brewing facility for storage, production, or packaging.

(b)

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, beer, malt beverages, and hard cider may be sold for on-premises or off-premises consumption during all legal operating hours in which business is normally and legally conducted on the premises, if:

(1)

The brewery provides tours through its facility; and

(2)

Only sealed containers are removed from the premises.

(c)(1)

A small brewery may provide beer, malt beverages, and hard cider it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations or sell for resale beer, malt beverages, and hard cider it manufactures to charitable or nonprofit organizations holding valid special event permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(2)

The sale of those products is limited to the duration of the particular special event.

(d)

After July 31, 2017, the director shall not issue a small brewery license to a person or entity having more than five percent (5%) common ownership with a person or entity holding a license under this subchapter or qualifying as a supplier under §3-5-1102, except as permitted under §3-5-1204(c).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 5; 2009, No. 1459, § 2; 2015, No. 857, § 9; 2015, No. 1237, § 3; 2017, No. 865, § 2; 2017, No. 950, § 4; 2019, No. 691, § 16.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (a)(1)(A), inserted “and no more than thirty thousand (30,000) barrels per year” in (a)(1)(A)(i), inserted (a)(1)(D) through (a)(1)(G) and (a)(2)(D), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment by No. 857 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendment by No. 1237 rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment by No. 865 added (d).

The 2017 amendment by No. 950 inserted “and on the premises of the one (1) separate brewing facility of a small brewery authorized under subdivision (a)(9) of this section” in (a)(3); redesignated part of former (a)(4) as (a)(4)(A) and added (a)(4)(B); inserted “from all facilities under common ownership with the small brewery” in (a)(6)(A)(i)

(b)

; and added (a)(8) and (a)(9).

The 2019 amendment added (a)(7)(C).

3-5-1406. Additional license to sell small brewery beer, malt beverages, and hard cider not required.

(a)

Any wholesale or retail dealer that is licensed to sell beer, malt beverages, and hard cider may sell beer, malt beverages, and hard cider produced by small brewers without any additional license fee.

(b)

Any retail dealer not licensed to sell beer, malt beverages, and hard cider may sell beer, malt beverages, and hard cider produced by small brewers and microbrewery-restaurants licensed under §3-5-1204 if the retailer pays a retail dealer’s license fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 6; 2015, No. 857, §
9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

3-5-1407. Transportation.

(a)

A small brewery may transport its beer, malt beverages, and hard cider along any highway, road, street, or other thoroughfare of travel.

(b)

A small brewery may ship its products out of the state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service, and common carriers and other appropriate parcel delivery services may accept beer, malt beverages, and hard cider from Arkansas small brewers for delivery outside the state.

(c)

A small brewery in this state may ship its products within the state by common carrier or other appropriate parcel delivery service, and common carriers and other appropriate parcel delivery services may accept beer, malt beverages, and hard cider from Arkansas small breweries for delivery within the state if the beer, malt beverages, and hard cider are only shipped to persons holding a wholesale permit to purchase, store, sell, or dispense beer, malt beverages, and hard cider.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 7; 2015, No. 857 §
9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment replaced “native” with “small” throughout the section, and made stylistic changes.

3-5-1408. Fees and taxes.

A small brewer shall:

(1)

Pay any applicable city or county license or permit fees and barrelage or taxes and shall pay a state licensing fee to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of three hundred dollars ($300) per fiscal year to:

(A)

Manufacture and sell its beer, malt beverages, and hard cider for consumption, both on and off the premises; and

(B)

Sell any other beer, malt beverages, and hard cider purchased from a licensed dealer for consumption on or off the premises;

(2)

Measure beer, malt beverages, and hard cider manufactured by the small brewer or purchased from a contract brewery, or otherwise comply with applicable rules respecting excise and enforcement tax determination of the beer, malt beverages, and hard cider, and pay any applicable bond or deposit and the amount of the state excise tax and enforcement tax to this state as required, but is free from the fees and taxes provided in §3-5-205 and as required by §§3-7-104 and3-7-111; and

(3)

Pay a tax at the rate of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) per barrel, and proportionately for larger and smaller gallonages per barrel, on all beer, malt beverages, and hard cider in quantities of up to forty-five thousand (45,000) barrels per year and sold or offered for sale in the state.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 8; 2009, No. 1459, § 3; 2015, No. 857 §
9; 2019, No. 315, § 82.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “three hundred dollars ($300)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” in the introductory language of (1); substituted “small brewer” for “native brewer” in (2); and substituted “thirty thousand (30,000)” for “sixty thousand (60,000)” in (3).

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2).

3-5-1409. Beer, malt beverage, and hard cider education.

(a)(1)

A small brewer may be allowed to conduct beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting events for educational or promotional purposes at any location in a wet area of this state if approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and if written notice is given by the division to the small brewer at least five (5) days before the event.

(2)

Requests for approval to conduct beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting events must be received by the division at least two (2) weeks before the event.

(b)

Beer-, malt beverage-, and hard cider-tasting events may be held in any facility licensed by the division if written notice is given by the division under subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 9; 2015, No. 857, §
9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

3-5-1410. Licenses — Application.

A small brewers' license shall not be issued unless the applicant files with the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division a verified application in a form and content that the director requires, accompanied by payment of the applicable fee.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 10; 2015, No. 857, §
9.

3-5-1411. Operation without license prohibited.

It is a Class C misdemeanor for any person not holding a valid small brewers' license to operate as a small brewer.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 11; 2015, No. 857, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “small” for “native” twice.

3-5-1412. Dry areas prohibited.

It is unlawful for the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to issue a small brewers' license in any city, county, township, or other area in this state if the sale or possession of beer, malt beverages, and hard cider is unlawful.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 12; 2015, No. 857, §
9.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment substituted “small” for “native” and made stylistic changes.

3-5-1413. Rules.

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may adopt rules for the implementation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 13; 2019, No. 910, § 3325.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

3-5-1414. Construction.

This subchapter is supplemental to all other laws concerning alcoholic beverages and repeals only those laws or parts of laws in direct conflict with it.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1805, § 14.

3-5-1415. Sales on any day of week.

Small brewery beer, malt beverages, and hard cider may be sold at any small brewery located in this state for on-premises or off-premises consumption on any day of the week.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1459, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to §1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

3-5-1416. Small brewery is a supplier.

(a)

A small brewery selling and transporting beer, malt beverages, and hard cider produced on the premises of the small brewery is a supplier.

(b)

A small brewery is not subject to §3-5-1101 et seq. unless the small brewery exceeds annual production of beer, malt beverages, and hard cider of fifteen thousand (15,000) barrels.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1459, § 4; 2015, No. 857, §
10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to
§1-2-207, the amendment by Acts 2015, No. 1237, is incorporated into this section.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section.

3-5-1417. Exemption for front-of-house employees.

A front-of-house employee may be employed simultaneously by another holder of a permit or license issued by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 950, § 5.

3-5-1418. Small brewery tap room.

(a)

A small brewery tap room may:

(1)

For beer and hard cider produced by the small brewery, sell for both on-premises and off-premises consumption; and

(2)

For beer, hard cider, and wine not produced by the licensed small brewery, sell for on-premises consumption.

(b)

A small brewery tap room may operate a restaurant.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 950, § 5.

Subchapter 15

— Temporary Wine Charitable Auction Permit

3-5-1501. Temporary wine charitable auction permit.

(a)

There is established a temporary wine charitable auction permit.

(b)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall issue the permit to qualifying charitable nonprofit organizations that are exempt from taxation under § 501 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2005, and that have received tax exempt status from the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to § 501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2005.

(c)

The permit shall authorize the qualifying charitable nonprofit organization to sell wine for the purpose of raising funds for the charitable organization during a live or silent auction conducted by the charitable organization.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

U.S. Code.

Sections 501 and 501(c)(3) and (4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, referred to in this section, are codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 501 and 501(c)(3) and (4), respectively.

3-5-1502. Authorized location of auction.

(a)

The holder of a temporary wine charitable auction permit may conduct an auction in any area of the State of Arkansas where the sale of the wine is authorized.

(b)

The holder of a permit may conduct an auction at a premises of another on-premises permit that is licensed to sell or dispense the wine if:

(1)

The wine to be auctioned is kept separate from the wine sold, stored, or served at the permitted premises; and

(2)

The wine, whether sold or unsold, is removed from the premises immediately following the auction.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

3-5-1503. Disposition of auction proceeds.

The proceeds from the sale of wine sold at a charitable auction as authorized by this subchapter shall be deposited into the account of the charitable organization that holds the temporary wine charitable auction permit.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

3-5-1504. Origination of wine to be auctioned.

(a)

The wine to be auctioned shall be obtained by:

(1)

Donation from any person or an out-of-state winery, if the laws of the out-of-state winery allow the donation;

(2)

Donation or purchase from a licensed winery within the state; or

(3)

Donation or purchase from a licensed Arkansas wholesaler.

(b)

If wine to be auctioned is obtained as provided in this subchapter, the provisions of §3-3-216 shall not apply to any person who, for purposes of sale of the wine at a charitable auction:

(1)

Ships or transports the wine into Arkansas;

(2)

Stores or possesses the wine in Arkansas; or

(3)

Purchases the wine at a charitable auction as provided for in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

3-5-1505. Prohibited activities.

The holder of a temporary wine charitable auction permit shall not:

(1)

Auction any wine that has not been obtained as provided for in this subchapter;

(2)

Conduct more than two (2) auctions during any calendar year;

(3)

When the auction is conducted on a premises that holds a permit for the sale or dispensing of wine, allow the auctioned wine to be consumed on the permitted premises; and

(4)

Pay a commission or promotional fee to:

(A)

Any person to arrange or conduct an auction authorized under this subchapter; or

(B)

Arrange for the donation of wine to be auctioned by the charitable organization.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

3-5-1506. Permit duration, fees, and gross receipts.

(a)

The temporary wine charitable auction permit shall be issued for a period of not more than five (5) days.

(b)

The fee for the permit shall be fifty dollars ($50.00).

(c)

The gross receipts from the sale of wine at a charitable auction under this section shall not be subject to the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §26-52-101 et seq., nor shall the taxes imposed under title 3 of the Arkansas Code be applicable.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1.

3-5-1507. Administrative rules.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall adopt rules governing the application, issuance, and use of a temporary wine charitable auction permit.

(b)(1)

The division shall also adopt rules establishing penalties for violation of this subchapter or rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter.

(2)

However, penalties adopted by the division shall not exceed penalties which may be imposed on charitable organizations holding other types of temporary permits.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1157, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 83.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a).

Subchapter 16

— Free Trade Among Small Wineries

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2007, No. 668, § 4, provided: “In the event that this act, or any part thereof, is determined by a court to be unconstitutional, this act shall become void and all wines, including native wines, distributed for sale in the State of Arkansas shall be distributed under §3-2-401 et seq. and sold by licensed retailers under §3-4-201 et seq.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 6: Apr. 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that Act 294 of 2009 became effective, by emergency clause, on March 3, 2009, and that it has been found that there are some technical corrections that need to be placed into immediate operation. It is further determined that these technical corrections are necessary to give full force and effect to the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 and that if this technical corrections bill is not passed with an emergency clause then unnecessary confusion concerning the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 may arise. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-1601. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, “small farm winery” means a wine-making establishment that sells no more than two hundred fifty thousand gallons (250,000 gals.) of wine, the alcoholic content of which does not exceed twenty-one percent (21%) annually as reported on the federal tax report form TTB F 5120-17, as it existed on January 1, 2007. For the purposes of this subchapter, a winery or a group of wineries consisting of at least fifty percent (50%) common ownership is to be considered one (1) small farm winery.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1.

3-5-1602. Licensing of small farm wineries.

(a)

An in-state or out-of-state small farm winery may apply to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for a small farm winery license.

(b)(1)

A small farm winery may be licensed by the board.

(2)

The license shall:

(A)

Show the registration number and location of the small farm winery;

(B)

Show the name of the person that owns or operates the small farm winery; and

(C)

Be conspicuously posted at the small farm winery.

(c)(1)

The small farm winery license authorizes the licensee to perform the following functions without the small farm winery having to obtain a separate license:

(A)

Manufacture wines and bottle wines produced by that small farm winery;

(B)

Bottle wines produced by another small farm winery;

(C)

Serve on the premises or at small farm winery off-premises retail sites complimentary samples of wine produced by the small farm winery or another licensed small farm winery, if the small farm winery or its off-premises retail site is located in a wet territory;

(D)

Sell at retail by the drink or by the package wine produced on the premises of the small farm winery or produced by another small farm winery, if all sales occur in a wet territory and at:

(i)

The small farm winery off-premises retail sites; or

(ii)

Fairs and food and wine festivals, with the permission and the consent of the management of the events. A sales and use tax permit is also required;

(E)(i)

Sell and transport wine produced on the premises of the small farm winery or of another small farm winery to wholesale and retail license holders and small farm winery license holders.

(ii)

To exercise the privileges of subdivision (c)(1)(E)(i) of this section, the small farm winery shall obtain a wine wholesale permit or sell to a licensed small farm winery wholesaler;

(F)

Sell for consumption on the premises wine produced by the small farm winery or another small farm winery and purchased by the drink or by the package at the licensed premises, if the small farm winery is located in a wet territory;

(G)

Receive shipments of sparkling wine or champagne in bottles with or without a label from other in-state or out-of-state small farm wineries; and

(H)

Sell for on-premises or off-premises consumption hard cider manufactured by a hard cider manufacturer, if all sales occur in a wet territory.

(2)

A small farm winery off-premises retail site shall be separately licensed under §3-5-1605(a)(3) before performing the operations listed in subdivision (c)(1) of this section at the off-premises retail site.

(d)

An applicant for a small farm winery license shall submit with its application to the board a copy of the small farm winery's federal basic permit and proof documenting its annual wine production.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1; 2009, No. 1195, § 1; 2013, No. 1001, § 1; 2019, No. 691, § 17.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (c)(1)(E); and in (c)(1)(E)(i), substituted “subdivision (c)(1)(E)(i) of this section” for “this subdivision,” inserted “or sell to a licensed small farm winery wholesaler,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendment added (c)(1)(G).

The 2019 amendment added (c)(1)(H).

3-5-1603. Restaurant wine license — Retail malt beverage license.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may issue a restaurant wine license and a retail malt beverage license to a small farm winery license holder, if the issuance of the restaurant wine license and the retail malt beverage license are in connection with the establishment and operation of a restaurant, hotel, inn, bed and breakfast, museum, conference center, or any similar business enterprise for the purpose of promoting viticulture, enology, and tourism.

(b)

The retail malt beverage license issued under this section shall limit the license to the sale of malt beverages for consumption on the premises only.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1.

3-5-1604. Existing native winery licenses.

(a)

A person that holds a license as a native winery issued under this chapter before March 29, 2007, may conduct business as a small farm winery until the native wine license expires.

(b)

Upon the expiration of a native wine license issued under this chapter before March 29, 2007, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may issue a small farm winery license as part of the renewal process if the winery:

(1)

Meets the criteria under §3-5-1602(c)(1);

(2)

Is in good standing; and

(3)

Submits the winery's federal basic permit and proof of annual wine production to the board.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1.

3-5-1605. License fees generally.

(a)

For the privilege of doing business respectively, as indicated in this section, there shall be imposed, assessed, levied, and collected each fiscal year beginning July 1, the following license fees:

(1)(A)

For the privilege of manufacturing wine in quantities not to exceed five thousand gallons (5,000 gals.), a license fee of two hundred dollars ($200) shall be paid by the manufacturer.

(B)

However, a person in this state may manufacture wine from fruits or vegetables in quantities not to exceed two hundred gallons (200 gals.) for consumption in the person's home by the person and the person's guests but not for sale free from the license fee under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section;

(2)

For the privilege of manufacturing small farm wine in excess of five thousand gallons (5,000 gals.), a license fee of four hundred dollars ($400) shall be paid by the manufacturer;

(3)(A)

For the privilege of selling small farm winery wine except by a manufacturer for consumption at the manufacturer's winery, there shall be paid for each retail dealer's license a fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(B)(i)

This subdivision (a)(3) applies to all retail licenses for grocery stores, convenience stores, liquor stores, and package stores that sell malt beverages and wine.

(ii)

A retail liquor store may sell small farm winery wine without the small farm winery wine retail permit;

(4)(A)

For the privilege of selling small farm wine except by a manufacturer at the manufacturer's winery, there shall be paid for each wholesale dealer's license a fee of one hundred dollars ($100).

(B)

This subdivision (a)(4) applies to all alcoholic beverage wholesale distributors;

(5)

For the privilege of selling small farm winery wine at the small farm winery or in this state, there is imposed, assessed, and levied a tax of seventy-five cents (75¢) per gallon upon all the small farm winery wine manufactured and sold in this state under this subchapter; and

(6)

For the privilege of selling small farm winery light wine at the small farm winery or in this state, there is imposed, assessed, and levied a tax of twenty-five cents (25¢) per gallon upon all small farm winery light wine manufactured and sold in this state under the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

For existing licenses:

(1)

A person that holds a license for the sale of native wine issued under this chapter before March 29, 2007, may conduct business as a small farm winery wholesaler or retailer until the native wine license expires; and

(2)

Upon the expiration of a native wine license issued under this chapter on or before March 29, 2007, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board may issue a new license as part of the renewal process if the wholesaler or retailer:

(A)

Meets the criteria under this section; and

(B)

Is in good standing.

(c)

Tax on wine shall be based on the amount sold.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1; 2009, No. 294, § 18; 2009, No. 548, §§ 4–6; 2009, No. 763, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 29, provided: “The permit fees increased or established in this act shall become effective beginning with the
2010 – 2011 renewal and new permit period.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 294, in (a), substituted “two hundred dollars ($200)” for “one dollar ($1.00) per one thousand (1,000) gallons” in (a)(1)(A), rewrote (a)(1)(B), substituted “four hundred dollars ($400)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250)” in (a)(2), redesignated (a)(3), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100)” for “fifteen dollars ($15.00)” in (a)(3)(A), redesignated (a)(4), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00)” in (a)(4)(A), and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 548, in (a), rewrote the introductory language of (a)(1)(B), and substituted “alcoholic beverage” for “beverage alcohol” in (a)(4); and made minor stylistic changes in (a) and (b).

The 2009 amendment by No. 763 inserted “liquor stores, and package stores” in (a)(3)(B)(i), inserted (a)(3)(B)(ii), and made related changes.

3-5-1606. Rules.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1.

3-5-1607. Sales on any day of the week.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, small farm winery wine may be sold at any winery located in this state for on-premises or off-premises consumption on any day of the week.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1.

3-5-1608. Bond.

By consent of the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, the small farm winery may file a bond with the secretary, the bond to be approved by him or her, which will entitle the small farm winery to the privilege of making settlement of its taxes every thirty (30) days, the time to be set by the secretary.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 3326.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “secretary” for “director” three times.

3-5-1609. Penalty.

Upon conviction, a person who violates this subchapter or any reasonable rule adopted under this subchapter by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 668, §
1; 2009, No. 548, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 3327.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “Upon conviction,” deleted “or regulation” following “rule,” inserted “under this subchapter,” and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director”.

Subchapter 17

— Direct Shipment of Vinous Liquor Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 2015, No. 236, § 2: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax Agreement requires that the tax base for local taxes be identical to state taxes unless otherwise prohibited by law. Current Arkansas law creates a different tax base for state sales tax as compared to local sales tax. If Arkansas is determined to be out of compliance with the agreement, the state could lose approximately ten million dollars annually in state and local sales tax collections from businesses that have voluntarily registered to report and pay tax under the agreement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2017, No. 313, § 4: Mar. 1, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act calls for public notice of a drawing for the issuance of small farm winery private-resident shipping permits to small farm winery licensees holding wine wholesale permits; that the drawing will require the actual presence in the state of persons from various states; that sufficient notice must be available to all potential participants in the drawing; and that this act is immediately necessary because the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board requires time to make public notice, to prepare the drawing operations, and to ensure that all interested persons have the opportunity to seek eligibility for the drawing. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 848, § 2: Apr. 3, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends Acts 2017, No 313, § 3, that became effective March 2, 2017, as a result of an emergency clause; Act 313 of 2017 requires immediate action by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, and small farm winery license holders; the language of this bill alters the timelines imposed by Act 313 of 2017 and the procedure by which permits are issued; without the immediate enactment of this act, confusion will exist as to the procedures to be implemented for issuing permits under Act 313 of 2017 and unnecessary costs will be incurred to comply with Act 313 of 2017. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-5-1701. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Direct Shipment of Vinous Liquor Act”.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1.

3-5-1702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Small farm winery” means a wine-making establishment that:

(A)

Is licensed under §3-5-1601 et seq.; and

(B)

Produced by fermentation at least eight hundred gallons (800 gals.) of wine in the previous calendar year, as reported on the winery’s TTB F 5120-17 Report of Wine Premises Operations;

(2)

“Vinous liquor” means the fermented juices of fruits containing more than five percent (5%) and not more than twenty-one percent (21%) of alcohol by weight; and

(3)

“Winery” means an establishment that makes vinous liquor.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1; 2017, No. 313, §
1.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted (1) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

3-5-1703. Registration — Renewal fee.

(a)(1)

Unless registered under this subchapter, a winery licensed by this state or the state where its principal place of business is located shall not ship vinous liquor to an Arkansas consumer.

(2)

This section does not apply to a small farm winery licensed under §3-5-1601 et seq.

(b)

Prior to the winery's first shipment into or within the state, the winery shall:

(1)

Register with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(2)

Provide the division with a copy of the winery's current license to manufacture wine issued by:

(A)

The state of domicile; and

(B)

The Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau of the United States Department of the Treasury; and

(3)

Pay a registration fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(c)

A winery shall renew its application each year with the division by:

(1)

Providing the division with a copy of the licenses required under subdivision (b)(2) of this section; and

(2)

Paying a renewal fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

History.

Acts 2013, No. 483, §
1; 2017, No. 313, §
2.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added (a)(2).